Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB834.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1521. Marrow and cell donation.(a) Option to learn about enrolling.--The department shall include on an electronic application to obtain or renew a driver's license or identification card an option for the applicant to learn about enrolling as a volunteer bone marrow or blood cell donor in the national registry.(b) Contents.--The application under subsection (a) must include the following:(1) The age range required to become a volunteer bone marrow or blood cell donor with the national registry.(2) The option to learn about enrolling in the national 123456789101112131415161718 registry, including a link for an applicant to select that directs the applicant to the National Marrow Donor Program's website.(c) Memorandum of understanding.--The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the National Marrow Donor Program to mutually agree upon all of the following:(1) The language included on the application explaining the option to learn about enrolling in the national registry.(2) A link for the department to include on the application that is unique to the driver's license and identification card applications.(3) Distribution of digital information on the National Marrow Donor Program, which may include digital signs, quick response codes, digital notices, digital pamphlets and digital brochures and which, if and to the extent provided electronically by the National Marrow Donor Program, shall be provided without cost to the Commonwealth.(d) Posting.--The department and the Department of Health shall post on their publicly accessible Internet websites the link to the National Marrow Donor Program's publicly accessible Internet website containing information about enrolling in the national registry as a volunteer bone marrow or blood cell donor.(e) Effect.--Enrollment in the national registry does not constitute a legal document under 20 Pa.C.S. § 8613 (relating to manner of executing anatomical gifts) and does not require registrants to donate if they are matched.(f) Use and dissemination of information.--Information obtained by the National Marrow Donor Program regarding an applicant shall be used only by the National Marrow Donor 20250SB0834PN0909 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Program consistent with the informed consent of the applicant.(g) Liability.--A public entity or public employee shall not be liable for loss, detriment or injury resulting directly or indirectly from false or inaccurate information contained in the enrollment form provided in accordance with this section.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"National Marrow Donor Program." The National Marrow Donor Program operated by a nonprofit organization which manages the C.W. Bill Young Cell Transplantation Program under 42 U.S.C. § 274k (relating to national program) and administers the national registry."National registry." The bone marrow donor registry established by the C.W. Bill Young Cell Transplantation Program under 42 U.S.C. § 274k and administered by the National Marrow Donor Program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in nine months.20250SB0834PN0909 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718